Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adult" means a person 18 years of age or older.

(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required application, pays the required fee, is at least 18 years of age, and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary act requirements.

(3) "Behavioral health" is a term that encompasses mental health, substance use, and co-occurring disorders.

(4) "Behavioral health support specialist" means a person certified to deliver brief, evidence-based interventions with a scope of practice that includes behavioral health under the supervision of a Washington state credentialed provider who has the ability to assess, diagnose, and treat identifiable mental and behavioral health conditions as part of their scope of practice. A behavioral health support specialist does not have within their scope of practice the ability to make diagnoses but does track and monitor treatment response and outcomes using measurement-based care.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Registered apprenticeship" means an apprenticeship program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW.

(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[ 2023 c 270 s 2.]